South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Tax Credits for Parental Choice in Education Act." SECTION 2.  Article 25, Chapter 6, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-6-3830. An individual who chooses to educate his child outside the public school system is allowed a refundable income tax credit equal to three thousand dollars for each child. The department shall include a line item on the individual income tax form to include the tax credit allowed by this section. The child of an individual claiming the credit must meet all private school or home school standards as required by law. The credit must be claimed by means of a form prescribed by the department containing that information required by the department for the accurate and efficient administration of this credit. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to income tax years after 2024. ----XX----